Louisiana, session 2026, HB3.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The legislature hereby recognizes that the Constitution of Louisiana
provides in Article VII, Section 11, that the governor shall present to the legislature a
five-year Capital Outlay Program and request implementation of the first year of such
program, and that the capital outlay projects approved by the legislature are to be made part
of the comprehensive state capital budget which shall, in turn, be adopted by the legislature.
Further, all projects in such budget adopted by the legislature requiring bond funds must be
authorized as provided in Article VII, Section 6 of the Constitution of Louisiana. The
legislature finds that over a period of years the legislature has enacted numerous bond
authorizations, but due to inflation and the requirements of specificity of amount for each
project, impossibility, or impracticability, many of the projects cannot be undertaken. All
of the unissued bonds must be listed in the financial statements of the state prepared from
time to time and in connection with the marketing of bonds, and are taken into account by
rating agencies, prospective purchasers, and investors in evaluating the investment quality
and credit worthiness of bonds being offered for sale. The continued carrying of the
aforesaid unissued bonds on the financial statements of the state under the above described
circumstances operates unnecessarily to the financial detriment of the state. Accordingly,
the legislature deems it necessary and in the best financial interest of the state to repeal all
Acts, except any Act authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds and Act 41 of the 2006
First Extraordinary Session, providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds in the
Page 1 of 7

HB NO. 3 ENROLLED
state which cannot be issued for the projects contemplated, and in their stead to reauthorize
general obligation bonds of the state for those projects deemed to be essential, and to
authorize new projects.
Section 2. It is the intent of the legislature that this Act shall constitute the Omnibus
Bond Authorization Act of 2026 and, together with any Act authorizing the issuance of
refunding bonds and Act 41 of the 2006 First Extraordinary Session, shall provide bond
authorization, as required by Article VII, Section 6 of the Constitution of Louisiana, for
those projects to be funded totally or partially by the sale of general obligation bonds and
included in House Bill No. 2 of the 2026 Regular Session as finally enacted into law (2026
Capital Outlay Act). It is the further intent of the legislature that in this year and each year
hereafter an Omnibus Bond Authorization Act shall be enacted providing for the repeal of
state general obligation bond authorizations for projects no longer found feasible or
desirable, the reauthorization of those bonds not sold during the prior fiscal year for projects
deemed to be of such priority as to warrant such reauthorization, and to enact new
authorization for projects found to be needed for capital improvements.
Section 3. Except as hereinafter provided, all prior Acts of the legislature authorizing
the issuance of general obligation bonds of the state of Louisiana shall be and the same are
hereby repealed in their entirety. This repeal shall not be applicable to any Act providing
for the issuance of refunding bonds nor to Act 41 of the 2006 First Extraordinary Session,
and such Acts shall remain in full force and effect and shall not be affected by the provisions
of this Act. In addition, the repeal shall not in any manner affect the validity of any bonds
heretofore issued pursuant to any of the bond authorizations repealed hereby.
Section 4. To provide funds for certain capital improvement projects the State Bond
Commission is hereby authorized pursuant to Article VII, Section 6 of the Constitution of
Louisiana to issue general obligation bonds or other general obligations of the state for
capital improvements for the projects, and subject to any terms and conditions set forth on
the issuance of bonds or the expenditure of monies for each project as is provided for in the
2026 Capital Outlay Act.
Section 5.(A) To provide funds for certain capital improvement projects authorized
prior to this Act and by this Act, which projects are designed to provide for reimbursement
of debt service on general obligation bonds, the State Bond Commission is hereby authorized
Page 2 of 7

HB NO. 3 ENROLLED
pursuant to Article VII, Section 6 of the Constitution of Louisiana, to issue general
obligation bonds of the state, hereinafter referred to as "project bonds", for capital
improvements for the projects and subject to any terms and conditions set forth on the
issuance of bonds or the expenditure of monies for each such project as provided in the 2026
Capital Outlay Act the terms of which require such reimbursement of debt service.
(B) Without affecting, restricting, or limiting the pledge herein made of the full faith
and credit of the state of Louisiana to the payment of the general obligation bonds authorized
by this Section and without affecting, restricting, or limiting the obligation of the state to pay
the same from monies pledged and dedicated to and paid into the Bond Security and
Redemption Fund, but in order to decrease the possible financial burden on the general funds
of the state resulting from this pledge and obligation, the applicable management board,
governing body, or state agency for which any of such project bonds are issued, in the fiscal
year in which such project bonds are issued and in each fiscal year thereafter until such
project bonds and the interest thereon are paid, shall transfer and make available to the state
treasury, for deposit in the Bond Security and Redemption Fund, designated student fees or
revenues or other revenues in an amount equal to the debt service on such project bonds in
such fiscal year. In addition, the applicable management board, governing body, or state
agency, in the fiscal year in which such project bonds are issued and in each of the nine
immediately succeeding fiscal years thereafter, shall transfer and make available to the state
treasury from designated student fees or revenues or other revenues, for credit to a
reimbursement reserve account for such project bonds which shall be established in an
account designated in the reimbursement contract hereafter provided for, monies in an
amount equal to one-tenth of the average annual debt service on such project bonds, and
each such reimbursement reserve account thereafter shall be maintained in said minimum
amount by further transfers, if necessary, from designated student fees or revenues or other
revenues by the applicable management board, governing body, or state agency to the state
treasury. Each such reimbursement reserve account shall be used, if necessary, solely to
make the reimbursement payments herein obligated to be made to the state treasury. When
the general obligation bonds and the interest thereon issued hereunder have been paid, an
amount remaining in the reimbursement reserve account, as prorated to such authorized
Page 3 of 7

HB NO. 3 ENROLLED
project, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the applicable management board,
governing body, or state agency.
(C) No project bonds authorized by this Section shall be issued for any authorized
project unless and until a reimbursement contract has been entered into and executed
between the applicable management board, governing body, or state agency and the State
Bond Commission pertaining to the reimbursement payment and reimbursement reserve
account payments for such project. The contract shall require payment into the state treasury
of designated student fees or revenues or other revenues in an amount sufficient to reimburse
the cost to the state of the principal, interest, and premium, if any, obligated to be paid by
the state on such project bonds. The State Bond Commission shall not be required to
execute any such reimbursement contract unless the estimates and projections of the
designated student fees or revenues or other revenues available for payment into the state
treasury thereunder for the authorized projects are sufficient to reimburse the costs of the
principal, interest, and premium, if any, on the project bonds. A reimbursement contract
hereunder shall be authorized by resolution of the applicable management board, governing
body, or state agency, or board or by act of the chief executive officer if no governing board
exists. This authorization shall provide for the dates, amounts, and other details for the
payments required to be made to the state treasury and for the reserve account. The
authorization may contain such covenants with the State Bond Commission regarding the
fixing of rates for fees and charges or revenues and such other covenants and agreements
with the State Bond Commission as will assure the required payments to the state treasury.
The contract shall be subject to approval by the Office of the Attorney General and the State
Bond Commission and, when so accepted and approved, shall conclusively constitute and
be the reimbursement contract for an authorized project, as required hereunder.
(D) The obligation to make the reimbursement payments as required by a
reimbursement contract may be represented by the issuance by the applicable management
board, governing body, or state agency of its nonnegotiable revenue obligation in the form
of a bond or other evidence of indebtedness, hereinafter referred to as "reimbursement
bond". The reimbursement bond shall be issued in a single bond form, without coupons, in
the principal amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of project bonds, shall be
registered in principal and interest in the name of and be payable to the State Bond
Page 4 of 7

HB NO. 3 ENROLLED
Commission, shall bear interest at a rate or rates equal to the interest rate or rates payable
on the project bonds, and shall be payable as to principal and interest at such times, in such
manner, from designated student fees or revenues, or other revenues, and be subject to such
terms and conditions as shall be provided in the authorizing resolution or document executed
by a chief executive officer, where applicable. This authorization shall be subject to approval
by the State Bond Commission and the Office of the Attorney General, and when so
accepted and approved, the authorization shall constitute and be the reimbursement contract
for such authorized project, as required hereunder. The reimbursement bonds authorized
under the provisions of this Section may be issued on a parity with outstanding
reimbursement bonds of the applicable management board, governing body, or state agency,
or issued on a subordinate lien basis to outstanding bonds, or a combination thereof, and may
include and contain such covenants with the State Bond Commission for the security and
payment of the reimbursement bonds and such other customary provisions and conditions
for their issuance by the applicable management board, governing body, or state agency as
are authorized and provided for by general law and by this Section. Until project bonds for
an authorized project have been paid, the applicable management board, governing body,
or state agency shall impose fees and charges in an amount sufficient to comply with the
covenants securing outstanding bonds and to make the payments required by the
reimbursement contract.
(E) In addition to the other payments herein required, reimbursement contracts shall
provide for the setting aside of sufficient student fees or revenues or other revenues in a
reserve fund, so that within a period of not less than ten years from date of issuance of
project bonds there shall be accumulated in a reserve fund monies equal to a sum not less
than the average annual debt service requirements on such project bonds. Monies in the
reserve fund shall be used for the purpose of remedying or preventing a default in making
the required payments under a reimbursement contract. The reserve fund required hereunder
may consist of a reserve fund heretofore or hereafter established to secure payments for
reimbursement bonds of the applicable management board, governing body, or state agency,
provided that (1) payments from said reserve fund to secure the payments required to be
made under a reimbursement contract shall be on a parity with the payments to be made
securing outstanding bonds and additional parity bonds and (2) no additional parity
Page 5 of 7

HB NO. 3 ENROLLED
reimbursement bonds shall be issued except pursuant to the establishment and maintenance
of an adequate reserve fund as approved by the State Bond Commission.
(F) When the balance of reimbursement bond proceeds, for a project, are allocated
to another project, the State Bond Commission is authorized to make the appropriate
amendment to the reimbursement contract with the agency making the reimbursement
payments.
Section 6. The bonds authorized to be sold by the State Bond Commission pursuant
to this Act shall be issued and sold in conformity with the provisions of Article VII, Section
6 of the Louisiana Constitution, R.S. 39:1361 through R.S. 39:1367, and R.S. 39:1401
through R.S. 39:1430.1, and any amendments thereto adopted prior to, at the same time as,
or subsequent to, the effective date of this Act. However, the provisions of R.S. 39:1365(9)
shall not apply to any bonds issued hereunder in the form of variable rate and/or tender
option bonds and that said bonds need not be issued in serial form and may mature in such
year or years as may be specified by the State Bond Commission. Should any provision of
this Act be inconsistent with any provision of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the
provision of this Act shall govern. In connection with the issuance of the bonds authorized
hereby, the State Bond Commission may, without regard to any other laws of the state
relating to the procurement of services, insurance, or facilities, enter into contracts upon such
terms as it deems advantageous to the state for (1) the obtaining of credit enhancement or
liquidity devices designed to improve the marketability of the bonds and (2) if the bonds are
structured as variable rate and/or tender option bonds to provide the services and facilities
required for or deemed appropriate by the State Bond Commission for such type of bonds,
including those of tender agents, placement agents, indexing agents, remarketing agents,
and/or standby bond purchase facilities. The cost of obtaining credit enhancement or
liquidity devices and fees for other services set forth in this Section shall, if authorized by
the State Bond Commission, be paid from the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as a
requirement with respect to the issuance of the bonds authorized hereby. The bonds shall be
general obligations of the state of Louisiana, to the payment of which, as to principal,
premium, if any, and interest, as and when the same become due, the full faith and credit of
the state is hereby irrevocably pledged. These bonds shall be secured by monies in the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund and shall be payable on a parity with bonds and other
Page 6 of 7

HB NO. 3 ENROLLED
obligations heretofore and hereafter issued which are secured by that fund. The maximum
interest rate or rates on such bonds, and their maturities, shall be determined by the State
Bond Commission. The state treasurer shall invest all bond proceeds until disbursed.
Section 7. The Treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer to the Bond
Security and Redemption Fund to be expended on general obligation bond debt service of
the related bonds (including any bonds issued to refinance such bonds) any unexpended bond
proceeds balance of any general obligation account created prior to 2020 having a balance
of $10,000 or less. If such bonds or refunding bonds are no longer outstanding, then such
unexpended bond proceeds shall be applied to pay debt service on any outstanding general
obligation bonds.
Section 8. Unless specifically repealed, this Act shall expire and be considered null
and void and of no further effect on June 30, 2027, except as to any bonds authorized herein
(1) which have been sold, (2) to which lines of credit have been issued, or (3) for which
contracts for construction have been signed.
Section 9. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7